District of Columbia statutes.
38-1303

Higher Education Licensure Commission — Established.

There is established for the District of Columbia a Higher Education Licensure Commission (“Commission”) which shall license postsecondary educational institutions subject to this chapter and their agents, ensure authenticity and legitimacy of the educational institutions, serve as the state approving agency for veterans educational benefits, provide standards and criteria, and administer rules and regulations, including rules of procedure for the Commission to ensure adequate public notice of each meeting of the Commission.

History

Apr. 6, 1977, D.C. Law 1-104, § 3, 23 DCR 8734
Mar. 16, 1989, D.C. Law 7-217, § 2(c), 36 DCR 523
Feb. 27, 2016, D.C. Law 21-74, § 2(b), 63 DCR 252

Cross References

Candidates for commission, disclosure of interests, see § 1-1106.02.
Licensing of institutions of learning to confer degrees, see § 29-615 et seq.

Section References

This section is referenced in § 38-1313 and § 38-2602.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 31-1603.
1973 Ed., § 31-2003.

Effect of Amendments

The 2016 amendment by D.C. Law 21-74 substituted “Higher Education Licensure Commission” for “Education Licensure Commission” throughout the section.

Temporary Legislation

For temporary (225 days) amendment of this section, see § 2(b) of the Higher Education Licensure Commission Temporary Amendment Act of 2015 (D.C. Law 21-51, Jan. 9, 2016, 62 DCR 13983).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 2(b) of the Higher Education Licensure Commission Emergency Amendment Act of 2015 (D.C. Act 21-158, Oct. 16, 2015, 62 DCR 13715).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 2(b) of the Higher Education Licensure Commission Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2016 (D.C. Act 21-284, Jan. 27, 2016, 63 DCR 1188).

Mayor's Orders

Realignment of functions within the Department of Consumer and Regulatory Affairs: See Mayor’s Order 96-15, February 8, 1996 ( 43 DCR 1112).